New Jersey, session 221, S2251.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Environmental Protection shall not demolish, otherwise remove, or require the demolition or removal of any cabin or similar structure located in tidal wetlands in Lower Alloways Creek Township, Salem County, when the cabin or similar structure serves as a general use structure available for use by any person who needs a way station.  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the State shall not be liable for any damage to personal or real property or injury incurred to a person using such a cabin or similar structure.  This immunity of the State from liability shall be in addition to other immunity therefor provided to the State by any other statutory or common law. b.    The provisions of subsection a. of this section shall not apply to any cabin or similar structure: (1) for which there is documentation demonstrating that the State acquired the land on which the cabin or similar structure is located prior to the construction of the cabin or similar structure; (2) for which there is documentation demonstrating that the cabin or similar structure was built in violation of State law; or (3) constructed by the State. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.